Utah statutes.
53A-25a-103.   Braille skills assessment -- Development of individualized education program.

(1)  Any assessment required for a blind student shall include a Braille-related or Braille skills assessment, including a statement of the individual's present level of performance.

(2) (a)  Prior to determining whether a blind student should use Braille as the primary reading mode, the student's IEP team must be provided with detailed information about the use and efficiency of Braille as a reading medium.

(b)  The team shall acquire the information through pertinent literature or discussions with competent Braille users and educators, or both, in order to make an informed choice as to the student's primary reading mode.

(3)  In developing an IEP for each blind student, there is a presumption that proficiency in Braille is essential for the student to achieve satisfactory educational progress.

(4)  The use of and instruction in Braille are not required under this section if, in the course of developing the student's IEP, the team determines that the student's visual impairment does not significantly affect reading and writing performance commensurate with ability.

(5)  Nothing in this section requires the exclusive use of Braille if other special education services are appropriate to meet the student's educational needs.

(6)  The provision of other appropriate special education services does not preclude the use of Braille or Braille instruction.

